Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska7-116
Disbarment and contempt cases; judgment for costs; transcript to district court; lien; effect.

Judgments for costs herein provided for may be filed in the district court of any county in this state, and shall thereupon become a lien and be enforceable in such county in the same manner as other money judgments.

Laws 1955, c. 8, § 3, p. 73.